Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 18

City Manager-Commission Charter—Adoption or Surrender

6-18-101. Definitions — Chapters 18-22.

“City,” in chapters 18-22 of this title, refers to any city that may adopt these chapters, and “county” refers to the county in which any such city is located; and

“This charter” refers to chapters 18-22 of this title.

Whenever the “county election commission” is referred to in chapters 18-22 of this title, it means the county election commission of the county in which the territory proposed to be incorporated or the municipality is situated. If the territory proposed to be incorporated or the municipality includes parts of two (2) or more counties, it means the county election commission in each of such counties and they shall act jointly in performing the functions required of county election commissions in chapters 18-22 of this title.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 22, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a244; Code 1932, § 3642; Acts 1977, ch. 300, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1801.

Cross-References. City manager-council charters, title 6, chapters 30-36.

Mayor-aldermanic charters, title 6, chs. 1-4.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city judge to require violators of municipal traffic ordinances to attend safety school in lieu of fine or other punishment, OAG 95-0591995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (5/25/95).

City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

Authority of city manager and commissioners under city manager-commission charter. OAG 11-11, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/11).

Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

6-18-102. Construction of chapters 18-22.

In the construction of any portion of chapters 18-22 of this title whose meaning or application is in dispute, it is intended that its phraseology shall be liberally construed to effect the substantial objects of these chapters.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 22, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a245; Code 1932, § 3643; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1802.

6-18-103. Right to adopt city manager form — Incorporation within specified distances from existing cities.

The residents of any incorporated municipality or of any territory that it is desired to incorporate shall have the right to adopt chapters 18-22 of this title in the manner provided in this charter; and thereupon such city or territory shall be and become incorporated and be governed as set forth in this charter. No unincorporated territory shall be incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title unless such territory contains not less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) persons, who shall be actual residents of the territory, and shall also contain real estate included in the territory worth not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

No unincorporated territory shall be allowed to hold a referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter until a plan of services is documented, setting forth the identification and projected timing of municipal services proposed to be provided and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. The plan of services shall be attached to the petition to incorporate when such petition is filed with the county election commission. The plan of services shall include, but not be limited to, police protection, fire protection, water service, sanitary sewage system, solid waste disposal, road and street construction and repair, recreational facilities, a proposed five-year operational budget, including projected revenues and expenditures, and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. Municipalities that are first incorporated on or after July 1, 1993, and that produce no local own-source revenues in any fiscal year, shall not receive any state-shared revenues during the next fiscal year.

Prior to filing the petition with the county election commission, a public hearing on the referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter and plan of services shall be conducted. The public hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation for two (2) consecutive weeks.

No unincorporated territory shall be incorporated within three (3) miles of an existing municipality or within five (5) miles of an existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population, according to the latest census certified by the department of economic and community development. “Existing municipality” and “existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population” do not include any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census certified by the department of economic and community development.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated if the following conditions are fulfilled:

The territory contains two hundred twenty-five (225) residents or more;

The territory is composed of property that is one thousand six hundred feet (1,600') or more above sea level on the western border of the territory and contiguous with a county boundary on the eastern border of the territory;

The territory is located within an area that is bordered on the west, north and east by the Tennessee River and on the south by the border between Tennessee and another state; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated that meets the following conditions:

The territory contains three hundred (300) residents or more;

The territory's western boundary is contiguous with the western boundary of the county in which it is located;

The territory is located within an area that is bordered on the north by the Loosahatchie River and on the south by the Wolf River;

The territory's eastern boundary is approximately parallel with the western boundary, but in no place is more than eight (8) miles from the western boundary; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding the requirements of § 6-18-104, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the petition for incorporation of the territory described in subsection (d) may consist of a letter from a resident of the territory desiring to incorporate to the county election commission requesting that the question of incorporating the territory be placed on the ballot. The letter shall describe the exact boundaries of the proposed municipality, indicate the name of the proposed municipality, and indicate under which charter the territory desires to incorporate. The letter shall be treated as a petition meeting all the requirements of law.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, whenever the governing body of any existing city affected by this section, by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of its governing body, indicates that it has no interest in annexing the property to be incorporated, and when a certified copy of such resolution and a petition requesting that an incorporation election be held are filed with the county election commission, then the proceedings shall continue as provided in this chapter as though the proposed new incorporation was not within the specified distance of such existing city as provided in this section.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census; provided, that in any adjoining county an existing municipality that is within the specified distance may also use the procedure authorized by subdivision (f)(1).

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 1, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a120; Code 1932, § 3517; Acts 1955, ch. 7, § 1; 1957, ch. 347, § 1; 1971, ch. 260, § 2; 1974, ch. 776, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1803; Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 3; 1993, ch. 320, §§ 5, 6; 1995, ch. 13, § 6; 1996, ch. 666, §§ 2, 5; 1996, ch. 708, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Public Acts 1977, chapters 346 and 451 ratified and validated the incorporation of certain cities and towns, one of which was Brentwood, irrespective of failure to comply with election requirements.

Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor title 6, chapter 51 shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Annexation Law: History, Analysis, and Proposed Amendments (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Restrictions on municipal incorporation: constitutionality, OAG 95-114, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (11/21/95).

6-18-104. Election to adopt city manager form.

An election for the purpose of determining whether or not chapters 18-22 of this title shall become effective for any city shall be included on the ballot at the next election, as defined in § 2-1-104, by the county election commission upon the petition in writing of thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the registered voters of the city or territory, which petition shall state therein in a sufficient manner the boundaries of the proposed municipal corporation, which may be done by a general reference to the boundaries then existing if there is one. Petitioners shall attach a list of the names of all persons who at the time of making the list would be qualified voters in the proposed territory. The county election commission shall, in addition to all other notices required by law, publish one (1) notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the territory of the city or of the proposed city and post the notice in at least ten (10) places in the territory.

At any time not less than thirty (30) days prior to the election provided for in this section, the request or petition may be withdrawn or may be amended to call for a smaller territory for the proposed municipal corporation so long as all of the proposed smaller territory is contained within the boundaries of the territory described in the first petition or request. The withdrawal or amendment shall be valid if filed with the county election commission in writing and executed by twenty percent (20%) of the number of the registered voters voting at the last election within the boundaries of the territory described in the original request or petition, and if signed by not less than fifty-one percent (51%) of those who signed the original request or petition. In the event such an amended request or petition is filed, all provisions relating to time periods in § 6-18-103 shall be controlled by the date of the filing of the original petition, notwithstanding the filing of the amended request or petition, and the county election commission shall publish the notice of election as provided for in this section. A petition for request to withdraw, when filed with and validated by the county election commission, shall render the original request or petition null and void.

Following the defeat of an incorporation in an election held pursuant to this section, no new request for petition for an election may be filed until after the expiration of four (4) years. If the territory included in the boundaries of the newly proposed municipal corporation includes less than fifty percent (50%) of the territory subject to incorporation in such previous election, and if the territory subject to incorporation in such election comprises less than fifty percent (50%) of the territory included in the boundaries of the newly proposed municipal corporation, the four-year waiting period shall not be required.

If a proposal to incorporate a territory is defeated in an election held pursuant to this section by a number of negative votes comprising more than sixty percent (60%) of the persons voting, no further incorporation election shall be held for a period of four (4) years from the previous election unless the conditions established in subsection (c) are met.

If a proposal to incorporate a territory is defeated in an election held pursuant to this section by a number of negative votes comprising less than sixty percent (60%) of the persons voting, no further incorporation election shall be held for a period of two (2) years from the previous election unless the conditions established in subsection (c) are met.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 1, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a122; Code 1932, § 3519; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1804; Acts 1980, ch. 778, § 1; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 3, 4; 1989, ch. 175, § 1; 1997, ch. 98, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

The 1997 amendments to this section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) were found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997). The provisions as set out above reflect the section as it appeared prior to the 1997 amendments.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act shall not affect the incorporated status of any existing municipality; that the new petition requirement established by the amendment by that act shall apply only to incorporation petitions filed on or after April 26, 1989, and that for petitions filed before April 26, 1989, but for which the incorporation election has not been held, the old requirements shall apply.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

6-18-105. Registration of voters — Qualifications to vote — Certification of result.

The county election commission shall use such methods authorized by title 2 as it judges necessary to facilitate registration before the election.

All registered voters of the city or of the territory of the proposed city are eligible to vote in the election.

The county election commission shall determine and declare the results of the election and shall certify the results within forty-eight (48) hours after it completes its duties under § 2-8-105(3). It shall publish the certificate in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or territory and, if the city is already incorporated, shall file the certificate with the city council or other legislative body of the city at its first meeting after the certification. The certificate shall be entered at large on the minutes of the body with which it is filed.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 1, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a123; Code 1932, § 3520; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1805.

6-18-106. Effect of favorable vote.

If it is found, as provided in § 6-18-105, that the majority of the votes cast are in favor of the adoption of chapters 18-22 of this title, it shall be deemed to have been adopted.

Except for the provisions of chapters 18-22 of this title that are adopted by reference in other municipal charters, chapters 18-22 of this title apply only to those cities that have adopted chapters 18-22 of this title by referendum as authorized by law.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 1, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a124; Code 1932, § 3521; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1806; Acts 1983, ch. 33, § 5; 1995, ch. 13, § 7.

6-18-107. Succession to old corporation.

Chapters 18-22 of this title shall take effect in any city immediately after the election and organization of the first board of commissioners provided for in this charter, and thereupon any then existing charter of such city shall immediately become abrogated and null. The right, title and ownership of all property of the city and all of its uncollected taxes, dues, claims, judgments, and choses in action, and all of its rights of every kind whatsoever, shall immediately become vested in the corporation so chartered under chapters 18-22 of this title. The new corporation shall answer and be liable for all debts, contracts, and obligations of the corporation that it succeeds in the same manner and proportion and to the same extent as the former corporation was liable under existing laws. All ordinances, laws, resolutions, and bylaws duly enacted and in force under the preexisting charter and not inconsistent with chapters 18-22 of this title shall remain in full force until repealed, modified, or amended as provided in this charter.

The zoning ordinance duly enacted and in force in any county shall apply to any unincorporated territory in the county incorporated under chapters 18-22 of this title until such incorporated city shall duly enact zoning ordinances, or for a period of six (6) months from the date the first board of commissioners shall take their respective offices, whichever occurs first.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 1, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a121; Code 1932, § 3518; Acts 1973, ch. 14, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1807.

6-18-108. Surrender of charter.

After the adoption of this charter and the election of the commissioners, a majority of whom are elected for a four-year period as provided in subsection (b), no election for the surrender of this charter shall be called or held for a period of four (4) years from the date the first board of commissioners shall take their respective offices.

After the expiration of the four-year period, and upon the filing of a petition in the same manner as provided for the adoption of chapters 18-22 of this title containing the signatures of the same number of registered voters and praying for a surrender of such charter, an election shall be held to determine whether or not the same shall be surrendered; provided, that in case of a failure to surrender such charter, the election shall not be held more frequently than at two-year intervals thereafter. For a four-year period after the first board of commissioners shall take office, the cost of calling and holding such an election shall be borne by those petitioning therefor if such election does not result in a surrender of this form of charter. Should such election, however, result in a surrender, the cost of such election shall be borne by the city and following the expiration of such four-year period the cost of such election shall be borne by the city.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1808.

Cross-References. Petition for abolition of charter, § 6-52-201.

6-18-109. Conduct of surrender election — Qualifications to vote.

The county election commission has the same duties with respect to an election for the surrender of a charter as it has with respect to an election to adopt a charter under this title. Any registered voter of the city may vote in the election.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1809.

6-18-110. Termination of charter — New charter.

If a majority of the votes cast in the election provided for in this charter shall favor the termination of such form of government, such charter shall terminate at one (1) minute past midnight (12:01 a.m.) on the sixtieth day following the date of such election unless it falls upon a Sunday, in which case it shall terminate at one (1) minute past midnight (12:01 a.m.) on the next day. If previous to the adoption of this form of charter such city or town functions under a different charter, then upon termination of this charter such prior charter shall become effective at the time mentioned in this subsection (a), and territory previously unincorporated shall revert to that status.

If by law in the case of unincorporated territory another charter may be adopted by vote of the electors, the question as to whether or not such other form of charter shall be adopted may be placed upon the ballot to be used in the election mentioned in this section, if the petition filed requests the same, and if all other necessary legal steps to adopt such other form of charter have been taken prior to the election.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1810.

6-18-111. Election of new officers after surrender of charter — Filing deadline — Qualifications to vote.

In case there is a previously incorporated city or if a new charter is adopted as provided in § 6-18-110, the county election commission shall call an election not less than forty (40) days nor more than fifty (50) days following the election for surrender of the charters provided in § 6-18-108, at which time municipal officials for the newly adopted form of government shall be chosen who shall take office upon the date fixed for the termination of the previous charter.

The qualifying deadline for filing nominating petitions shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the sixth Thursday before the election.

All registered voters of the municipality may vote in the election.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1811.

6-18-112. Succession to assets, liabilities and obligations after surrender of charter.

In case of a reversion to a former form of charter or adoption of a new one simultaneously with the surrender of the old, all assets, liabilities and obligations of such city shall become assets, liabilities and obligations of the new municipality, and in the event that a city shall revert to an unincorporated status, the governing body of such city thereupon shall become trustees of the property and funds of such former city and, under such bonds as may be required by the county legislative body, shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the city and dispose of its property.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1812.

6-18-113. Liquidation of affairs.

Should the property and funds be more than sufficient to meet the city's obligations, the surplus shall be paid into the treasury of the county to become a part of its general fund. Should the property and funds be insufficient to meet all the city's current obligations, the county legislative body is hereby authorized to levy and collect taxes upon the property within the boundaries of the former city and to pay same over to the trustees for the purpose of meeting such current deficit. The trustees shall terminate the affairs of the city as soon as possible, but in no event shall the trusteeship continue for more than thirty-six (36) months. Any matters, including obligations maturing after thirty-six (36) months, not disposed of within the period designated in this section shall become the responsibility of the county legislative body of the county wherein the city was located.

Acts 1951, ch. 92, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1813.

6-18-114. [Unconstitutional.]

Code Commission Notes.

This section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) was found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997) and has been deleted by the code commission.

6-18-115. Situs county of new municipality to continue receiving tax revenues until July 1 — Exception — Notice to department of revenue of incorporation.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever a new municipality incorporates under any form of charter, the county or counties in which the new municipality is located shall continue to receive the revenue from all state and local taxes distributed on the basis of situs of collection, generated within the newly incorporated area, until July 1 following the incorporation, unless the incorporation takes effect on July 1.

If the incorporation takes effect on July 1, then the municipality shall begin receiving revenue from such taxes generated within its corporate boundaries for the period beginning July 1.

Whenever a municipality incorporates, the municipality shall notify the department of revenue of such incorporation prior to the incorporation becoming effective, for the purpose of tax administration.

Such taxes shall include the local sales tax authorized in § 67-6-103, the income tax on dividends authorized in § 67-2-102, and all other such taxes distributed to counties and municipalities based on the situs of their collection.

Acts 1998, ch. 651, § 2.